testing/mhr-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sma/bin/isma.hfstol
    Morph: sma/bin/sma.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sma/bin/isma-norm.fst
    Morph: sma/bin/sma-norm.fst

Tests:
  Noun - олма: # -а
    олма+N+Sg+Nom: олма
    олма+N+Sg+Acc: олмам
    олма+N+Sg+Gen: олман
    олма+N+Sg+Ill: олмаш
    олма+N+Sg+Ine: олмаште
    олма+N+Sg+Ela: олмашке
